Utah statutes.
49-20-402.   Reserves to be held -- Refunds.
(1)  The reserves in a risk pool in a given fiscal year shall be maintained at
the level recommended by the program's consulting actuary and approved or
ratified by the board.  If the reserves drop below that level, covered
employers in the risk pool are required to cure any deficiency in the reserve.
(2)  If substantial excess reserves are accrued above those required by this
chapter, and the board determines that a refund is appropriate, a refund shall
be made:
(a)  to covered employers which shall then make a refund to covered
individuals on the basis of the contribution of each to the plan; or
(b)  directly to covered individuals on the basis of the contribution of each
to the plan.
